Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3605
Name, image, and likeness rights or athletic reputation; contract or agreement, restrictions; conflict with team contract, effect.

(1) No student-athlete shall enter into a contract or agreement with a sponsor that provides compensation to the student-athlete for use of the student-athlete's name, image, and likeness rights or athletic reputation if (a) such contract or agreement requires such student-athlete to display such sponsor's apparel or to otherwise advertise for the sponsor during official team activities and (b) compliance with such contract or agreement requirement would conflict with a team contract. Any postsecondary institution asserting such conflict shall disclose to the student-athlete and the student-athlete's professional representation, if applicable, the full team contract that is asserted to be in conflict. The student-athlete and the student-athlete's professional representation, if applicable, shall be prohibited from disclosing any terms of a team contract that the postsecondary institution deems to be a trade secret or otherwise nondisclosable.

(2) No team contract shall prevent a student-athlete from receiving compensation for the use of such student-athlete's name, image, and likeness rights or athletic reputation when the student-athlete is not engaged in official team activities.

Laws 2020, LB962, § 5;

Laws 2022, LB1137, § 5.